parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/agr4xip.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	mappings for XIP added to lookup output
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller
# DATE:		01-Dec-2005
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -l [ThisFile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

define MASC	[ %+Masc | %+MF | %+MN | %+MFN ];
define FEM  	[ %+Fem  | %+MF | %+FN | %+MFN ];
define NEUT 	[ %+Neut | %+MN | %+FN | %+MFN ];
define GEND 	[ MASC | FEM | NEUT | %+Undef ];

define SING 	[ %+Sg | %+SgPl ];
define PLUR	[ %+Pl | %+SgPl ];

define NOM	[ %+Nom | %+NomAcc | %+NomAccDat | %+NomAccGen | %+NomAccDatGen ];
define ACC	[ %+Acc | %+AccDat | %+AccDatGen | %+AccGen 
		| %+NomAcc | %+NomAccDat | %+NomAccGen | %+NomAccDatGen ];
define DAT	[ %+Dat | %+Dat2 | %+DatGen | %+NomAccDat | %+NomAccDatGen
		| %+AccDat | %+AccDatGen ];
define GEN	[ %+Gen |%+NomAccGen | %+NomAccDatGen | %+AccDatGen | %+AccGen 
		| %+DatGen ];


read regex [

# modified tags for verb agreement
    %+Pl -> %+Pl1 %+Pl || %+1P3P (?) _ 
.o. %+Sg -> %+Sg1 %+Sg || %+1P3P (?) _ 
.o. %+Sg -> %+Sg1 || %+1P (?) _ 
.o. %+Sg -> %+Sg2 || %+2P (?) _ 
.o. %+Pl -> %+Pl1 || %+1P (?) _ 
.o. %+Pl -> %+Pl2 || %+2P (?) _ 
# remove person features
.o. [ %+1P | %+2P | %+3P | %+1P3P ] -> 0


# additional tags for nominal agreement
#.o. [..] -> %+msn || MASC SING NOM _
#.o. [..] -> %+msa || MASC SING ACC _
#.o. [..] -> %+msd || MASC SING DAT _
#.o. [..] -> %+msg || MASC SING GEN _

#.o. [..] -> %+fsn || FEM SING NOM _
#.o. [..] -> %+fsa || FEM SING ACC _
#.o. [..] -> %+fsd || FEM SING DAT _
#.o. [..] -> %+fsg || FEM SING GEN _

#.o. [..] -> %+nsn || NEUT SING NOM _
#.o. [..] -> %+nsa || NEUT SING ACC _
#.o. [..] -> %+nsd || NEUT SING DAT _
#.o. [..] -> %+nsg || NEUT SING GEN _

#.o. [..] -> %+xpn || GEND PLUR NOM _
#.o. [..] -> %+xpa || GEND PLUR ACC _
#.o. [..] -> %+xpd || GEND PLUR DAT _
#.o. [..] -> %+xpg || GEND PLUR GEN _


].i ;
